North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-41 North Dakota Coat of Arms

54-41-01.
Designation of coat of arms.

A coat of arms of the state of North Dakota is designated and described as follows:

Device: On an Indian arrowhead point to base or a bend vert charged with three mullets of the first, in base a fleur-de-lis of the second.

Crest: On a wreath or and azure, a sheaf of three arrows argent armed and flighted gules behind a stringed bow fessways or with grip of the second (gules).

Motto: Strength from the soil.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 330, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-4101.

54-41-02.
Significant elements of coat of arms.

The colors of yellow gold and green are indicative of the great agricultural state of North Dakota and has particular reference to ripening grain and the abundant grazing areas. The Indian arrowhead forms the shield of the coat of arms and symbolizes the “Sioux State”. The three stars denote the trinity of government: legislative, executive, and judicial. Each star in the bend is given the heraldic value of thirteen which signifies the thirteen original colonies of the United States, and the cumulative numerical value of the three stars indicates that North Dakota was the thirty-ninth state admitted to the Union. The stars also allude to the history of the territory under three foreign flags. Three stars are borne upon the coat of arms of Meriwether Lewis of the Lewis and Clark expedition and also on the coat of arms of Lord Selkirk, head of the first permanent settlement in this state. The fleur-de-lis alludes to LaVerendrye, a French explorer who was the first known white man to visit the territory of this state. The blue and gold wreath in the crest reflects the history of the territory as part of the Louisiana purchase. The crest which shall constitute the military crest of the state of North Dakota is a motif taken from the state seal and to the Sioux Indian tribes signifies mighty warriors.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 330, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-4102.

54-41-03.
Authorized use.

The coat of arms of this state may be used in a manner consistent with the respect and dignity due a state coat of arms and its symbolic values by the following persons, organizations, and agencies:

The governor of North Dakota.

The North Dakota national guard.

Departments and agencies of the state of North Dakota.

North Dakota veterans organizations.

Officially recognized North Dakota educational institutions, systems, or divisions thereof.

Recognized North Dakota patriotic organizations.

The legislative assembly.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 330, § 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-4103; 2005, ch. 507, § 1.

54-41-04.
Employment as motif for color or standard — Use by governor.

When the coat of arms is employed as the motif of a pennant, color, or standard it must be superimposed upon a pennant of green, as identified by cable number 65007, in the center one-third horizontally, and the center two-thirds vertically. The motif must in the main be golden yellow as identified by cable number 65001. The pennant must be fringed by the same golden yellow as the coat of arms. The color cable numbers must be the same as are on file in the office of the quartermaster general of the army, Washington, D.C.

The proportion of the pennant, color, or standard must be as 1 width hoist is to 1.9 fly. When used by the governor the coat of arms upon any pennant, standard, or placard must have a white star embroidered or emblazoned on each of the four corners of the pennant, standard, or placard.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 330, § 4; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-4104.

54-41-05.
Unauthorized use — Penalty.

A person may not place or cause to be placed upon the coat of arms of this state any advertisement of any nature; or expose such coat of arms to public view when any advertisement has been attached thereto; or expose to public view for sale or any other purpose or have in that person’s possession for sale, gift, or other purpose, any article of merchandise or receptacle for carrying merchandise upon which the coat of arms of this state has been produced or attached for the purpose of advertising or calling attention to such article. Any person violating the provisions of this section is guilty of an infraction.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 330, § 5; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-4105; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 589.